Hawaii statutes.
[§453-52] Expedited partner
therapy. (a) A health professional may, in addition to treating a
patient, provide expedited partner therapy to the partners of the patient if
all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The patient has a laboratory-confirmed or
suspected clinical diagnosis of a sexually transmitted disease;

(2) The patient indicates that the patient has
partners with whom the patient has engaged in sexual activity within the
sixty-day period immediately preceding the diagnosis of a sexually transmitted
disease; and

(3) The patient indicates that the patient's partners
are unable or unlikely to seek clinical services in a timely manner.

(b) A health professional who provides
expedited partner therapy as authorized in this section shall do all of the
following:

(1) Dispense or prescribe antibiotic therapy in the
name of the partners, if known, without the physical examination of the
partners by the health professional. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
if the name of the partners are not known, the health professional shall
dispense or prescribe the antibiotic therapy in the name of "Expedited
Partner Therapy";

(2) Convey to the patient that it is important to
notify the patient's partners of the patient's diagnosis and that it is
important for the partners to obtain medical care for a complete evaluation,
testing for sexually transmitted diseases, counseling, and treatment;

(3) Distribute to the patient the information sheet
developed pursuant to section 453-53; and

(4) Follow all Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention guidelines related to the practices and recommendations for
expedited partner therapy. [L 2013, c 250, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next